Utah statutes.
73-3-20.   Right to divert appropriated waters into natural streams --
Requirements -- Storage in reservoir -- Information required by state engineer
-- Lapse of application.
(1)  Upon application in writing and approval of the state engineer, any
appropriated water may, for the purpose of preventing waste and facilitating
distribution, be turned from the channel of any stream or any lake or other
body of water, into the channel of any natural stream or natural body of water
or into a reservoir constructed across the bed of any natural stream, and
commingled with its waters, and a like quantity less the quantity lost by
evaporation and seepage may be taken out, either above or below the point
where emptied into the stream, body of water or reservoir.  In so doing, the
original water in such stream, body of water, or reservoir must not be
deteriorated in quality or diminished in quantity for the purpose used, and
the additional water turned in shall bear its share of the expense of
maintenance of such reservoir and an equitable proportion of the cost of the
reservoir site and its construction. Any person having stored his appropriated
water in a reservoir for a beneficial purpose shall be permitted to withdraw
the water at the times and in the quantities as his necessities may require if
the withdrawal does not interfere with the rights of others.
(2)  The state engineer may require the owner of record of an approved
exchange application to provide information concerning the diverting works
constructed, the extent to which the development under the exchange has
occurred, and other information the state engineer considers necessary to
insure the exchange is taking place, to establish the owner of the exchange
still has a legal interest in the underlying water right used as the basis for
the exchange, or to arrive at the quantity of water being exchanged.  This
information shall be provided by the owner of record of an approved exchange
within 60 days of notification by the state engineer.
(3)  The state engineer may lapse an application made pursuant to this section
under the following conditions:
(a)  the applicant has lost a legal interest in the underlying right used to
facilitate the exchange;
(b)  the exchange can no longer be carried out as stated in the application;
(c)  the applicant has not complied with the conditions established in
approving the exchange; or
(d)  the applicant fails to provide the information as outlined in Subsection
73-3-20(2).
